Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-609
License; form; display.

The license provided for in section 45-607 shall be in such form as prescribed by the board. If the licensee maintains a branch office, he, she, or it shall not do a collection agency business in such branch office until he, she, or it has secured a branch office certificate therefor. A licensee, so long as his, her, or its license is in full force and effect and in good standing, shall be entitled to branch office certificates for any branch offices operated by such licensee upon payment of the fee therefor provided in section 45-620. A licensee shall display his, her, or its license in a conspicuous place in his, her, or its principal place of business, and if he, she, or it conducts a branch office, the branch office certificate shall be conspicuously displayed in the branch office.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 13, p. 1598;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,170;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 9.